Utah statutes.
41-1a-201.   Function of registration -- Registration required.

Unless exempted, a person may not operate and an owner may not give another person permission to operate a motor vehicle, combination of vehicles, trailer, semitrailer, vintage vehicle, off-highway vehicle, or vessel in this state unless it has been registered in accordance with this chapter, Title 41, Chapter 22, Off-Highway Vehicles, or Title 73, Chapter 18, State Boating Act.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 218, 1992 General Session

